Illinois, session 104th, SB2640.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. If and only if House Bill 3458 of the 104th 5General Assembly as introduced becomes law, the Criminal Code 6of 2012 is amended by changing Section 12-3.05 as follows: 7    (720 ILCS 5/12-3.05)  (was 720 ILCS 5/12-4)8    Sec. 12-3.05. Aggravated battery. 9    (a) Offense based on injury. A person commits aggravated 10battery when, in committing a battery, other than by the 11discharge of a firearm, he or she knowingly does any of the 12following:13        (1) Causes great bodily harm or permanent disability 14    or disfigurement.15        (2) Causes severe and permanent disability, great 16    bodily harm, or disfigurement by means of a caustic or 17    flammable substance, a poisonous gas, a deadly biological 18    or chemical contaminant or agent, a radioactive substance, 19    or a bomb or explosive compound.20        (3) Causes great bodily harm or permanent disability 21    or disfigurement to an individual whom the person knows to 22    be a peace officer, community policing volunteer, fireman, 23    private security officer, correctional institution   SB2640- 2 -LRB104 12856 RLC 24215 b1    employee, or Department of Human Services employee 2    supervising or controlling sexually dangerous persons or 3    sexually violent persons:4            (i) performing his or her official duties;5            (ii) battered to prevent performance of his or her 6        official duties; or7            (iii) battered in retaliation for performing his 8        or her official duties.9        (4) Causes great bodily harm or permanent disability 10    or disfigurement to an individual 60 years of age or 11    older.12        (5) Strangles another individual. 13    (b) Offense based on injury to a child or person with an 14intellectual disability. A person who is at least 18 years of 15age commits aggravated battery when, in committing a battery, 16he or she knowingly and without legal justification by any 17means:18        (1) causes great bodily harm or permanent disability 19    or disfigurement to any child under the age of 13 years, or 20    to any person with a severe or profound intellectual 21    disability; or22        (2) causes bodily harm or disability or disfigurement 23    to any child under the age of 13 years or to any person 24    with a severe or profound intellectual disability. 25    (c) Offense based on location of conduct. A person commits 26aggravated battery when, in committing a battery, other than   SB2640- 3 -LRB104 12856 RLC 24215 b1by the discharge of a firearm, he or she is or the person 2battered is on or about a public way, public property, a public 3place of accommodation or amusement, a sports venue, or a 4domestic violence shelter, or in a church, synagogue, mosque, 5or other building, structure, or place used for religious 6worship.7    (d) Offense based on status of victim. A person commits 8aggravated battery when, in committing a battery, other than 9by discharge of a firearm, he or she knows the individual 10battered to be any of the following:11        (1) A person 60 years of age or older.12        (2) A person who is pregnant or has a physical 13    disability.14        (3) A teacher or school employee upon school grounds 15    or grounds adjacent to a school or in any part of a 16    building used for school purposes.17        (4) A peace officer, community policing volunteer, 18    fireman, private security officer, correctional 19    institution employee, or Department of Human Services 20    employee supervising or controlling sexually dangerous 21    persons or sexually violent persons:22            (i) performing his or her official duties;23            (ii) battered to prevent performance of his or her 24        official duties; or25            (iii) battered in retaliation for performing his 26        or her official duties.  SB2640- 4 -LRB104 12856 RLC 24215 b1        (5) A judge, emergency management worker, emergency 2    medical services personnel, or utility worker:3            (i) performing his or her official duties;4            (ii) battered to prevent performance of his or her 5        official duties; or6            (iii) battered in retaliation for performing his 7        or her official duties.8        (6) An officer or employee of the State of Illinois, a 9    unit of local government, or a school district, while 10    performing his or her official duties.11        (7) A transit employee performing his or her official 12    duties, or a transit passenger.13        (8) A taxi driver on duty.14        (9) A merchant who detains the person for an alleged 15    commission of retail theft under Section 16-26 of this 16    Code and the person without legal justification by any 17    means causes bodily harm to the merchant.18        (10) A person authorized to serve process under 19    Section 2-202 of the Code of Civil Procedure or a special 20    process server appointed by the circuit court while that 21    individual is in the performance of his or her duties as a 22    process server.23        (11) A nurse while in the performance of his or her 24    duties as a nurse. 25        (12) A merchant: (i) while performing his or her 26    duties, including, but not limited to, relaying directions   SB2640- 5 -LRB104 12856 RLC 24215 b1    for healthcare or safety from his or her supervisor or 2    employer or relaying health or safety guidelines, 3    recommendations, regulations, or rules from a federal, 4    State, or local public health agency; and (ii) during a 5    disaster declared by the Governor, or a state of emergency 6    declared by the mayor of the municipality in which the 7    merchant is located, due to a public health emergency and 8    for a period of 6 months after such declaration. 9    (d-1) It is a defense to aggravated battery when the 10individual battered is a peace officer and the officer 11responded to an incident in which the officer interacted with 12a person whom a reasonable officer could believe was having a 13mental health episode and the person with whom the officer 14interacted has a documented mental illness and acted abruptly. 15    (d-2) It is a defense to aggravated battery when the 16individual battered is a member of the General Assembly and 17the General Assembly member responded to an incident in which 18the General Assembly member interacted with a person whom a 19reasonable person could believe was having a mental health 20episode and the person with whom the member of the General 21Assembly interacted has a documented mental illness and acted 22abruptly. 23    (e) Offense based on use of a firearm. A person commits 24aggravated battery when, in committing a battery, he or she 25knowingly does any of the following:26        (1) Discharges a firearm, other than a machine gun or   SB2640- 6 -LRB104 12856 RLC 24215 b1    a firearm equipped with a silencer, and causes any injury 2    to another person.3        (2) Discharges a firearm, other than a machine gun or 4    a firearm equipped with a silencer, and causes any injury 5    to a person he or she knows to be a peace officer, 6    community policing volunteer, person summoned by a police 7    officer, fireman, private security officer, correctional 8    institution employee, or emergency management worker:9            (i) performing his or her official duties;10            (ii) battered to prevent performance of his or her 11        official duties; or12            (iii) battered in retaliation for performing his 13        or her official duties.14        (3) Discharges a firearm, other than a machine gun or 15    a firearm equipped with a silencer, and causes any injury 16    to a person he or she knows to be emergency medical 17    services personnel:18            (i) performing his or her official duties;19            (ii) battered to prevent performance of his or her 20        official duties; or21            (iii) battered in retaliation for performing his 22        or her official duties.23        (4) Discharges a firearm and causes any injury to a 24    person he or she knows to be a teacher, a student in a 25    school, or a school employee, and the teacher, student, or 26    employee is upon school grounds or grounds adjacent to a   SB2640- 7 -LRB104 12856 RLC 24215 b1    school or in any part of a building used for school 2    purposes.3        (5) Discharges a machine gun or a firearm equipped 4    with a silencer, and causes any injury to another person.5        (6) Discharges a machine gun or a firearm equipped 6    with a silencer, and causes any injury to a person he or 7    she knows to be a peace officer, community policing 8    volunteer, person summoned by a police officer, fireman, 9    private security officer, correctional institution 10    employee or emergency management worker:11            (i) performing his or her official duties;12            (ii) battered to prevent performance of his or her 13        official duties; or14            (iii) battered in retaliation for performing his 15        or her official duties.16        (7) Discharges a machine gun or a firearm equipped 17    with a silencer, and causes any injury to a person he or 18    she knows to be emergency medical services personnel:19            (i) performing his or her official duties;20            (ii) battered to prevent performance of his or her 21        official duties; or22            (iii) battered in retaliation for performing his 23        or her official duties.24        (8) Discharges a machine gun or a firearm equipped 25    with a silencer, and causes any injury to a person he or 26    she knows to be a teacher, or a student in a school, or a   SB2640- 8 -LRB104 12856 RLC 24215 b1    school employee, and the teacher, student, or employee is 2    upon school grounds or grounds adjacent to a school or in 3    any part of a building used for school purposes. 4    (f) Offense based on use of a weapon or device. A person 5commits aggravated battery when, in committing a battery, he 6or she does any of the following:7        (1) Uses a deadly weapon other than by discharge of a 8    firearm, or uses an air rifle as defined in Section 9    24.8-0.1 of this Code.10        (2) Wears a hood, robe, or mask to conceal his or her 11    identity.12        (3) Knowingly and without lawful justification shines 13    or flashes a laser gunsight or other laser device attached 14    to a firearm, or used in concert with a firearm, so that 15    the laser beam strikes upon or against the person of 16    another.17        (4) Knowingly video or audio records the offense with 18    the intent to disseminate the recording. 19    (g) Offense based on certain conduct. A person commits 20aggravated battery when, other than by discharge of a firearm, 21he or she does any of the following:22        (1) Violates Section 401 of the Illinois Controlled 23    Substances Act by unlawfully delivering a controlled 24    substance to another and any user experiences great bodily 25    harm or permanent disability as a result of the injection, 26    inhalation, or ingestion of any amount of the controlled   SB2640- 9 -LRB104 12856 RLC 24215 b1    substance.2        (2) Knowingly administers to an individual or causes 3    him or her to take, without his or her consent or by threat 4    or deception, and for other than medical purposes, any 5    intoxicating, poisonous, stupefying, narcotic, 6    anesthetic, or controlled substance, or gives to another 7    person any food containing any substance or object 8    intended to cause physical injury if eaten.9        (3) Knowingly causes or attempts to cause a 10    correctional institution employee or Department of Human 11    Services employee to come into contact with blood, seminal 12    fluid, urine, or feces by throwing, tossing, or expelling 13    the fluid or material, and the person is an inmate of a 14    penal institution or is a sexually dangerous person or 15    sexually violent person in the custody of the Department 16    of Human Services.17    (h) Sentence. Unless otherwise provided, aggravated 18battery is a Class 3 felony.19    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (a)(4), 20(d)(4), or (g)(3) is a Class 2 felony.21    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (a)(3) or 22(g)(1) is a Class 1 felony.23    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (a)(1) is a 24Class 1 felony when the aggravated battery was intentional and 25involved the infliction of torture, as defined in paragraph 26(10) of subsection (b-5) of Section 5-8-1 of the Unified Code   SB2640- 10 -LRB104 12856 RLC 24215 b1of Corrections, as the infliction of or subjection to extreme 2physical pain, motivated by an intent to increase or prolong 3the pain, suffering, or agony of the victim. 4    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (a)(1) is a 5Class 2 felony when the person causes great bodily harm or 6permanent disability to an individual whom the person knows to 7be a member of a congregation engaged in prayer or other 8religious activities at a church, synagogue, mosque, or other 9building, structure, or place used for religious worship. 10    Aggravated battery under subdivision (a)(5) is a Class 1 11felony if:12        (A) the person used or attempted to use a dangerous 13    instrument while committing the offense;14        (B) the person caused great bodily harm or permanent 15    disability or disfigurement to the other person while 16    committing the offense; or17        (C) the person has been previously convicted of a 18    violation of subdivision (a)(5) under the laws of this 19    State or laws similar to subdivision (a)(5) of any other 20    state. 21    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (e)(1) is a 22Class X felony.23    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (a)(2) is a 24Class X felony for which a person shall be sentenced to a term 25of imprisonment of a minimum of 6 years and a maximum of 45 26years.  SB2640- 11 -LRB104 12856 RLC 24215 b1    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (e)(5) is a 2Class X felony for which a person shall be sentenced to a term 3of imprisonment of a minimum of 12 years and a maximum of 45 4years.5    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (e)(2), 6(e)(3), or (e)(4) is a Class X felony for which a person shall 7be sentenced to a term of imprisonment of a minimum of 15 years 8and a maximum of 60 years.9    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (e)(6), 10(e)(7), or (e)(8) is a Class X felony for which a person shall 11be sentenced to a term of imprisonment of a minimum of 20 years 12and a maximum of 60 years.13    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (b)(1) is a 14Class X felony, except that:15        (1) if the person committed the offense while armed 16    with a firearm, 15 years shall be added to the term of 17    imprisonment imposed by the court;18        (2) if, during the commission of the offense, the 19    person personally discharged a firearm, 20 years shall be 20    added to the term of imprisonment imposed by the court;21        (3) if, during the commission of the offense, the 22    person personally discharged a firearm that proximately 23    caused great bodily harm, permanent disability, permanent 24    disfigurement, or death to another person, 25 years or up 25    to a term of natural life shall be added to the term of 26    imprisonment imposed by the court.  SB2640- 12 -LRB104 12856 RLC 24215 b1    (i) Definitions. In this Section:2    "Building or other structure used to provide shelter" has 3the meaning ascribed to "shelter" in Section 1 of the Domestic 4Violence Shelters Act.5    "Domestic violence" has the meaning ascribed to it in 6Section 103 of the Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 1986.7    "Domestic violence shelter" means any building or other 8structure used to provide shelter or other services to victims 9or to the dependent children of victims of domestic violence 10pursuant to the Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 1986 or the 11Domestic Violence Shelters Act, or any place within 500 feet 12of such a building or other structure in the case of a person 13who is going to or from such a building or other structure.14    "Firearm" has the meaning provided under Section 1.1 of 15the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act, and does not 16include an air rifle as defined by Section 24.8-0.1 of this 17Code. 18    "Machine gun" has the meaning ascribed to it in Section 1924-1 of this Code.20    "Merchant" has the meaning ascribed to it in Section 2116-0.1 of this Code. 22    "Strangle" means intentionally impeding the normal 23breathing or circulation of the blood of an individual by 24applying pressure on the throat or neck of that individual or 25by blocking the nose or mouth of that individual. 26(Source: P.A. 103-51, eff. 1-1-24; 10400HB3458.)